Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF45.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.8855, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Definitions. For the purposes of this sectiondeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin :new text end new text begin (1) "commissioner" means the commissioner of revenue; and new text end new text begin (2)new text end "significant tax expenditure," "tax," and "tax expenditure" have the meanings given in section 270C.11, subdivision 6. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.8855, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Membership. (a) The commission consists of: (1) two senators appointed by the senate majority leader; (2) two senators appointed by the senate minority leader; (3) two representatives appointed by the speaker of the house; (4) two representatives appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; and (5) the commissioner deleted text begin of revenuedeleted text end or the commissioner's designee. (b) Each appointing authority must make appointments by January 31 of the regular legislative session in the odd-numbered year. (c) If the chair of the house or senate committee with primary jurisdiction over taxes is not an appointed member, the chair is an ex officio, nonvoting member of the commission. new text begin (d) The commissioner may designate another individual to represent the commissioner or the commissioner's designee at any meeting of the commission. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.8855, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Duties. (a) For not more than three years after the commission is established, the commission must complete an initial review of the state's tax expenditures. The initial review must identify the deleted text begin purposedeleted text end new text begin objectivenew text end of each of the state's tax expendituresdeleted text begin , if none was identified in the enacting legislation in accordance with section 3.192deleted text end . The commission may also identify metrics for evaluating the effectiveness of an expenditure. (b) The commission must review and evaluate Minnesota's tax expenditures on a regular, rotating basis. The commission must establish a review schedule that ensures each tax expenditure will be reviewed by the commission at least once every ten years. The commission may review expenditures affecting similar constituencies or policy areas in the same year, but the commission must review a subset of the tax expenditures within each tax type each year. To the extent possible, the commission must review a similar number of tax expenditures within each tax type each year. The commission may decide not to review a tax expenditure that is adopted by reference to federal law. (c) Before deleted text begin Decemberdeleted text end new text begin Februarynew text end 1 of the year a tax expenditure is included in a commission report, the commission must hold a public hearing on the expenditure, including but not limited to a presentation of the review components in subdivision 5. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.8855, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Components of review. (a) When reviewing a tax expenditure, the commission must at a minimum: (1) provide an estimate of the annual revenue lost as a result of the expenditure; (2) identify the deleted text begin purposedeleted text end new text begin objectivenew text end of the tax expenditure deleted text begin if none was identified in the enacting legislation in accordance with section 3.192deleted text end ; (3) estimate the measurable impacts and efficiency of the tax expenditure in accomplishing the deleted text begin purposedeleted text end new text begin objectivenew text end of the expenditure; (4) compare the effectiveness of the tax expenditure and a direct expenditure with the same deleted text begin purposedeleted text end new text begin objectivenew text end ; (5) identify potential modifications to the tax expenditure to increase its efficiency or effectiveness; (6) estimate the amount by which the tax rate for the relevant tax could be reduced if the revenue lost due to the tax expenditure were applied to a rate reduction; (7) if the tax expenditure is a significant tax expenditure, estimate the incidence of the tax expenditure and the effect of the expenditure on the incidence of the state's tax system; (8) consider the cumulative fiscal impacts of other state and federal taxes providing benefits to taxpayers for similar activities; and (9) recommend whether the expenditure be continued, repealed, or modified. (b) The commission may omit a component in paragraph (a) if the commission determines it is not feasible due to the lack of available data, third-party research, staff resources, or lack of a majority support for a recommendation. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.8855, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Report to legislature. (a) By deleted text begin Decemberdeleted text end new text begin Februarynew text end 15 of each year, the commission must submit a written report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over tax policy. The report must detail the results of the commission's review of tax expenditures for the year, including the review components detailed in subdivision 5. (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), during the period of initial review under subdivision 4, the report may be limited to the deleted text begin purposedeleted text end new text begin objectivenew text end statements and metrics for evaluating the effectiveness of expenditures, as identified by the commission. The report may also include relevant publicly available data on an expenditure. (c) The report may include any additional information the commission deems relevant to the review of an expenditure. (d) The legislative committees with jurisdiction over tax policy must hold a public hearing on the report during the regular legislative session in the year following the year in which the report was submitted. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.8855, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Terms; vacanciesnew text begin ; meetingsnew text end . (a) Members of the commission serve a term beginning upon appointment and ending at the beginning of the regular legislative session in the next odd-numbered year. The appropriate appointing authority must fill a vacancy for a seat of a current legislator for the remainder of the unexpired term. Members may be removed or replaced at the pleasure of the appointing authority. (b) If a commission member ceases to be a member of the legislative body from which the member was appointed, the member vacates membership on the commission. new text begin (c) The commissioner of revenue must convene the first meeting of each year required under subdivision 4, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 270C.11, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Contents. (a) The report shall detail for each tax expenditure item: (1) the amount of tax revenue forgone; (2) a citation of the statutory or other legal authority for the expenditure; (3) the year in which it was enacted or the tax year in which it became effective; (4) the deleted text begin purposedeleted text end new text begin objectivenew text end of the expenditure, as identified deleted text begin in the enacting legislation in accordance with section 3.192 ordeleted text end by the Tax Expenditure Review Commission; (5) the incidence of the expenditure, if it is a significant sales or income tax expenditure; and (6) the revenue-neutral amount by which the relevant tax rate could be reduced if the expenditure were repealed. (b) The report may contain additional information which the commissioner considers relevant to the legislature's consideration and review of individual tax expenditure items. This may include but is not limited to analysis of whether the expenditure is achieving that objective and the effect of the expenditure on the administration of the tax system. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.192, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-00714 3.192 REQUIREMENTS FOR NEW OR RENEWED TAX EXPENDITURES. (a) Any bill that creates, renews, or continues a tax expenditure must include a statement of intent that clearly provides the purpose of the tax expenditure and a standard or goal against which its effectiveness may be measured. (b) For purposes of this section, "tax expenditure" has the meaning given in section 270C.11, subdivision 6. (c) Any bill that creates a new tax expenditure or continues an expiring tax expenditure must include an expiration date for the tax expenditure that is no more than eight years from the day the provision takes effect.